Alabama, session 2026rs, HB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning August 1, 2027, each local
board of education shall pay the employees of the board
semi-monthly one payday in arrears. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, salary payments based on the
semi-monthly plan shall be made on the first and sixteenth day
of each month.
(b) If the first or sixteenth day of any month, other
than the first day of October, falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or
holiday, then the salary payment shall be made on the last
workday immediately prior to the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.
If the first day of October falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or
Page 1

If the first day of October falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or
HB62 INTRODUCED
holiday, then the salary payment shall be made on the next
succeeding workday.
(c) A local board of education may opt out of the
provisions of this section by written board resolution. The
board must file this resolution with the State Superintendent
of Education within 60 days of passage of the resolution.
(d) The Comptroller, the State Superintendent of
Education, and the State Board of Education shall adopt
policies to implement the provisions of this section.
(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
implementation of a semi-monthly pay plan shall not reduce any
employee's annual rate of compensation.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 2